Massachusetts, session 194th, H3898.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. After enactment of this Act, the Town of Natick shall place a ballot 
2 question on the ballot at the next regular municipal or state election, or earlier special election, if 
3 so called, which ballot question shall read: 
4  “Shall the Town of Natick adopt the Charter amendments voted by Natick Town Meeting 
5 under Article 25 at the 2023 Fall Annual Town Meeting and under Article 2 of 2024 Special 
6 Town Meeting #1 and under Article 29 of 2024 Fall Annual Town Meeting and as enacted by the 
7 General Court in a Special Act, the text of which amendments are on file with the Office of the 
8 Town Clerk of Natick? 
9  Yes _____ No _____” 
10  If the number of “Yes” votes exceed the number of “No” votes at such election, these 
11 amendments shall take immediate effect, otherwise these amendments shall not take effect. 

2 of 27 12  SECTION 2: Amendments applicable to all sections of the Charter 
13  The title of the Town of Natick position of “town administrator” is hereby changed to 
14 “town manager” and that all references to “town administrator” in the pre-existing Town of 
15 Natick Home Rule Charter are hereby deleted and said title is herewith replaced with the term 
16 “town manager,” preserving the existing case formatting of the Town of Natick Home Rule 
17 Charter such that where the term “town administrator” appears in lower case it shall be replaced 
18 with the lower case phrase “town manager” and where term “Town Administrator” appears in 
19 upper case it shall be replaced with the upper case phrase “Town Manager”. 
20  SECTION 3: Charter Article 2 amendments 
21  Charter Section 2-6. The pre-existing Section 2-6(c) and the pre-existing Section 2-6(d) 
22 of the Town of Natick Home Rule Charter are hereby deleted and replaced, in numerical order, 
23 with the following replacement text as set forth below. 
24  Section 2-6 Vacancies 
25  (c) List of Persons Eligible to Fill Vacancies - Following each town election, the town 
26 clerk shall prepare for each precinct a list of persons who received votes for town meeting 
27 member, but who were not elected. Persons on each list shall be listed in descending order of 
28 votes received. The town clerk shall maintain each list until the next town election, removing 
29 from each list the names of persons: (1) who are appointed to fill vacancies, (2) who choose not 
30 to accept appointment when offered or (3) who are no longer eligible to be town meeting 
31 members. 

3 of 27 32  The lists so prepared and maintained shall at all times be subject to the review and 
33 approval of the Town Moderator or the Town Moderator’s designee. The Town Moderator may 
34 prepare and maintain such lists in the event of failure of the Town Clerk to prepare and maintain 
35 the same on a timely basis. 
36  (d) Filling of Vacancies - Whenever a vacancy has been declared to exist either by a letter 
37 of resignation filed with the town clerk, or (1) by the issuance of a certificate from the town clerk 
38 that such person has died or has removed from the town, or has failed to take the oath of office, 
39 or (2) there is a failure to elect a town meeting member, such vacancy shall be filled until the 
40 next town election from the list of persons eligible to fill vacancies in the precinct. The Town 
41 Moderator shall make appointments in accordance with the descending order of votes received 
42 on the lists. If necessary to resolve ties, the Town Moderator shall appoint a town meeting 
43 member to fill a vacancy by a lottery among those tied. Any such lottery shall be conducted at a 
44 time and place open to the public. 
45  In the event of a failure to appoint a person to fill a vacancy in a position of town meeting 
46 member, or the failure of a person so appointed to qualify, the Town Moderator shall schedule a 
47 caucus among the then current town meeting members in the precinct in question for the purpose 
48 of selecting a person to fill the vacant town meeting member position. Any such caucus shall be 
49 conducted at a time and place open to the public. The Town Moderator shall provide written 
50 notice of the date, time and location of such caucus to the then current town meeting members in 
51 the precinct in question, at least forty-eight hours (48) hours prior to such caucus, except where 
52 such forty-eight (48) hours is not possible due to town meeting scheduling requirements. 

4 of 27 53  Notice of such caucus shall be posted on the Natick Town Hall bulletin board and shall 
54 be posted on the Town of Natick website, in each event at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to 
55 such caucus, except where such forty-eight (48) hours’ notice is not possible due to town 
56 meeting scheduling requirements. 
57  The Town Moderator or the Town Moderator’s designee shall preside over such caucus. 
58 The eligible candidate who resides in the precinct in question and who receives the highest 
59 number of votes at such caucus shall serve as a town meeting member until the next annual town 
60 election. 
61  Charter Article 2-10. The pre-existing Section 2-10(a) of the Town of Natick Home Rule 
62 Charter is hereby deleted and replaced, in numerical order, with the following replacement text 
63 as set forth below. 
64  (a) Representatives of Town Agencies – The Town Moderator may require and schedule 
65 designated representatives of each town agency to attend any specific or all sessions of the 
66 representative town meeting for the purpose of providing the town meeting members with 
67 information pertinent to warrant articles concerning such town agencies. The Town Moderator 
68 may require such attendance to be in the same manner as attendance by town meeting members. 
69 If any such person is deterred by illness or other reasonable cause from attending, such person or 
70 the Town Moderator shall designate a deputy to attend in their place. The Town Moderator may 
71 establish procedures and requirements concerning remote accessibility of, contact for or 
72 participation by representatives from any town agency for the purposes of pertinent information 
73 to town meeting members. All representatives of town agencies, including any who may not be 
74 town residents, shall, during the consideration of articles affecting said agencies, have the same 

5 of 27 75 right to speak as a town meeting member, but shall have no right to make motions, or to vote. 
76 Nothing in this section shall prevent the Select Board, the School Committee, other elected 
77 multiple member body, the town manager, or the school superintendent from directing persons 
78 under their supervision or appointive control to attend any session of representative town 
79 meeting. 
80  Charter Section 2-11. The pre-existing Section 2-11(b) of the Town of Natick Home Rule 
81 Charter is hereby deleted and replaced, respectively in numerical order, with the following 
82 replacement text set forth below. 
83  (b) Initiation of Articles - The Select Board shall insert in the warrant all petitions which 
84 are addressed to and received by it and which request the submission of particular subject matter 
85 to the representative town meeting and which are filed by: (1) any elected town officer, (2) any 
86 eligible multiple member body, acting by a majority of its members, (3) any ten or more 
87 registered voters of the town for any annual town meeting and any one hundred or more 
88 registered voters of the town for any special town meeting as detailed in Massachusetts General 
89 Laws Chapter 39, Section 10, (4) such other persons or agencies as may be authorized by law, or 
90 by by-law. 
91  All such requests for submission of matters shall be in writing, but they shall not be 
92 required to conform to any particular style or form. The Select Board shall within fourteen days 
93 of receipt of a proposed zoning by-law amendment submit the same to the planning board for 
94 review. 
95  SECTION 4: Charter Article 3 amendments 

6 of 27 96  Charter Section 3-1(d) (8). The pre-existing Section 3-1(d)(8) of the Town of Natick 
97 Home Rule Charter is hereby deleted and replaced with the following replacement language set 
98 forth below. 
99  (8) Application of State Laws - Except as otherwise provided in this charter, the laws of 
100 the commonwealth governing town elections, special elections of town officers and special 
101 elections in towns shall, so far as applicable, govern such elections in the town of Natick. The 
102 foregoing procedures on preliminary elections shall not apply whenever the laws of the 
103 Commonwealth regarding ranked choice voting in local elections shall be effective in the town. 
104  Charter Section 3-1(f). The pre-existing Section 3-1(f) of the Town of Natick Home Rule 
105 Charter is hereby deleted and replaced with the following replacement language, as set forth 
106 below. 
107  (f) Coordination - Notwithstanding their election by the voters, the town officers, 
108 excluding the Town Moderator named in this section shall be subject to the call of the Select 
109 Board or the town manager , at all reasonable times, for consultation, conference and discussion 
110 on any matter relating both i) to their respective offices and ii) joint or overlapping areas of 
111 administrative activity or policy for the purpose of furthering coordinated administration of 
112 fiscal, prudential or municipal affairs of the executive branch of the town. Persons appointed by 
113 the Moderator are not subject to the call of the Select Board or town manager. 
114  Notwithstanding this provision, the Select Board or town manager may request 
115 consultation, conference, or discussion with any multiple member body or town agency on any 
116 matter concerning the administration referenced in this sub section.” 

7 of 27 117  Charter Section 3-2(b). The pre-existing Section 3-2(b) of the Town of Natick Home 
118 Rule Charter is hereby deleted and replaced with the replacement language set forth below. 
119  (b) Powers and Duties - The executive powers of the town shall be vested in the Select 
120 Board which shall be deemed to be the chief executive office in the town. The Select Board shall 
121 have all of the executive powers it is possible for a Select Board to have and to exercise. The 
122 Select Board shall serve as the chief policy making town agency. It shall be responsible for the 
123 issuance of policy directives and guidelines to be followed by all town agencies serving under it 
124 and, in conjunction with other elected town officers, to develop and to promulgate policy 
125 guidelines designed to bring all agencies of the town into harmony. Provided, however, nothing 
126 in this section shall be construed to authorize any member of the Select Board, nor a majority of 
127 them, to become involved in the day-to-day administration of any town agency. It is the intention 
128 of this provision that the Select Board shall act only through the adoption of broad policy 
129 guidelines which are to be implemented by officers and employees appointed by or under its 
130 authority. 
131  The Select Board shall cause a record of all its official acts to be kept. To aid it to 
132 perform its duties, the Select Board shall appoint a town manager as provided in Article 4. 
133  Charter Section 3.2(c). The pre-existing Section 3-2(c) is hereby deleted and replaced, 
134 respectively in numerical order, with the following replacement language as set forth below. 
135  (c) Appointment Powers - The Select Board shall, by a majority vote of the Select Board 
136 then elected and serving, appoint a town manager for a term of not more than three years, and 
137 may by a two thirds vote of the Select Board then elected and serving, appoint a town manager 
138 for a longer term not to exceed five years; three registrars of voters for terms of three years each, 

8 of 27 139 so arranged that one such term of office shall expire each year; a board of appeals to consist of 
140 five members appointed for terms of three years each, so arranged that as nearly an equal number 
141 of such terms as is possible shall expire each year, and three associate members appointed for 
142 terms of three years each, so-arranged that one such term of office shall expire each year; a 
143 conservation commission to consist of seven members appointed for terms of three years each, 
144 so arranged that as nearly an equal number of such terms as is possible shall expire each year; 
145 and shall either appoint or, by affirmative vote, approve the appointment of such other town 
146 agencies or officers as provided and specified in Article 6. 
147  The Select Board shall also appoint such other members of multiple member bodies as 
148 may be provided by town meeting vote or by their own vote for the purpose of conducting 
149 various studies. 
150  Charter Section 3-10(c). A new Charter Section 3-10(c) is hereby inserted with the 
151 following new language as set forth below. 
152  (c) Appointment Powers - The town moderator shall appoint a deputy moderator, to 
153 preside temporarily over representative town meeting in the temporary absence of the moderator. 
154 The moderator may also direct the deputy moderator to assist the moderator in performance of 
155 the moderator’s duties and responsibilities. The deputy moderator shall be appointed for a term 
156 not to exceed the remaining term of the moderator. The town moderator, but not the deputy 
157 moderator, shall have such other appointment power as provided in statute, charter or the bylaws 
158 or other vote of town meeting. 

9 of 27 159  Charter Section 3-12 . The pre-existing Section 3-12(b) of the Town of Natick Home 
160 Rule Charter is hereby deleted and replaced with the following replacement language, as set 
161 forth below. 
162  (b) Powers and Duties - The recreation and parks commission shall advise the town 
163 manager and the responsible department heads on all matters relating to recreational programs 
164 conducted by the recreation and parks department and on the maintenance of recreational 
165 facilities where those 
166  programs are conducted. The commission shall assure that programs are devised and 
167 conducted to meet the leisure time needs of all segments of the population. The recreation and 
168 parks commission shall also advise the Select Board on policies and practices for parks and 
169 recreation in the town. Whenever the position of director of recreation and parks department 
170 shall become vacant, the commission shall serve as a screening committee for the filling of such 
171 vacancy and shall submit two or more names to the town manager from whom the appointment 
172 shall be made. 
173  SECTION 5: Charter Article 4 amendments 
174  Charter Section 4-1(a), (b), and (c). The pre-existing Section 4-1(a), (b), and (c) of the 
175 Town of Natick Home Rule Charter are hereby deleted and replaced, respectively in numerical 
176 order, with the following replacement language set forth below. 
177  TOWN MANAGER 
178  Section 4-1 Appointment, Review, Other Activities 

10 of 27 179  (a) Appointment, Term of Office - The Select Board shall, by a majority vote of the 
180 Select Board then elected and serving, appoint a town manager, to serve for a term of not more 
181 than three years, and may by a two-thirds vote of the Select Board then elected and serving 
182 appoint 
183  a town manager for a longer term not to exceed five years provided, however, that the 
184 first six months of any individual's first appointment to the office shall be considered a 
185 probationary period. The Select Board shall make the appointment of a town manager from a list 
186 prepared by a screening committee in accordance with procedures and qualifications established 
187 by bylaw. 
188  The town manager shall be appointed solely on the basis of executive and administrative 
189 qualifications and shall be a person especially fitted by education, training and previous 
190 experience in business or public administration to perform the duties of the office of town 
191 manager. 
192  (b) Performance Review - The Select Board shall annually provide for a review of the job 
193 performance of the town manager which shall, at least in summary form, be a public record. 
194  (c) Restriction on Other Activities - The town manager shall devote full time to the duties 
195 of the office and shall not hold any other public office, elective or appointive, nor shall the town 
196 manager engage in any other business, occupation, or profession during their term unless such 
197 action is approved, in advance, in writing, by the Select Board.” 
198  Charter Section 4-2 and Section 4-3(a), (b) and (c). The pre-existing Section 4-2, the 
199 preexisting Sections 4-3(a), (b) and (c) of the Town of Natick Home Rule Charter are hereby 

11 of 27 200 deleted, and replaced, respectively in numerical order, with the following replacement language 
201 set forth below. 
202  Section 4-2 Powers and Duties 
203  The town manager shall be the chief administrative officer of the town and shall be 
204 responsible to the Select Board for the proper administration of all town affairs placed under the 
205 town manager’s charge by or under the charter and by-laws. The powers and duties of the town 
206 manager shall include, but are not intended to be limited to, those listed below in this section. 
207  Accordingly, the town manager: 
208  1) Shall supervise, direct and be responsible for the efficient administration of all 
209 functions placed under the town manager’s control by the charter, by by-law, by town meeting 
210 vote, by vote of the Select Board, or otherwise, including all officers appointed by the town 
211 manager and their respective department. 
212  2) Shall coordinate the activities of all town agencies under the town manager’s control 
213 with those under the control of officers and multiple member bodies who are elected directly by 
214 the voters of Natick. 
215  3) Shall appoint, and may remove, subject to the civil service law and any collective 
216 bargaining agreements as may be applicable, all department heads, all officers, subordinates and 
217 employees for whom no other method of selection is provided by the charter or by-laws, except 
218 persons serving under officers and multiple member bodies directly elected by the voters of 
219 Natick. Copies of all proposed appointments of the town manager shall be posted forthwith on 
220 the town bulletin board. Except as provided elsewhere in the charter or by-law concerning 

12 of 27 221 appointments requiring affirmative vote approval of the Select Board, appointments made by the 
222 town manager shall become effective on the fifteenth day following the day on which notice of 
223 the proposed appointment is filed with the Select Board, unless the Select Board shall within 
224 such period by majority vote of the full board vote to reject such appointment or has sooner 
225 voted to affirm it. 
226  4) Shall be entrusted with the administration of a town personnel system, including, but 
227 not limited to personnel policies and practices, rules and regulations, including provisions for an 
228 annual employee performance review, and amendments to the personnel by-law as warranted. 
229 The town manager shall prepare, maintain, and keep current, a plan establishing the personnel 
230 staffing requirements of each town agency, except those under the jurisdiction of the school 
231 committee. The town manager may be advised in connection with the administration of the town 
232 personnel system by a personnel board established by by-law. 
233  5) Shall attend all regular and special meetings of the Select Board, unless excused at the 
234 town manager’s own request, and shall have a voice, but no vote, in all of its proceedings. 
235  6) Shall attend all sessions of the representative town meeting and shall answer all 
236 questions addressed to the town manager related to warrant articles and which are related to 
237 matters under the town manager’s general supervision. 
238  7) Shall assure that all provisions of state laws, the charter, the by-laws and other votes of 
239 the town meeting, votes of the Select Board and of other town agencies which require= 
240 enforcement either by the town manager or by officers or employees subject to the town 
241 manager’s general supervision and direction, are faithfully carried out, performed and enforced. 

13 of 27 242  8) Shall prepare and submit, in the manner provided in Article 5, the fiscal documents 
243 pertaining to the annual operating budget and proposed capital outlay program for the town. 
244  9) Shall keep the Select Board fully informed as to the fiscal condition and needs of the 
245 town and shall make such recommendations to the Select Board and to other elected and 
246 appointive officers as the town manager may deem to be necessary or desirable. 
247  10) Shall assure that full and complete records of the financial and administrative 
248 activities of the town are kept and shall render full reports to the Select Board at the end of each 
249 fiscal year and at such other periods as it may reasonably require. 
250  11) Shall have full jurisdiction over the rental and use of all town facilities except those 
251 under the jurisdiction of the school committee. The town manager shall be responsible for the 
252 maintenance and repair of all town facilities, including, if authorized by a town meeting vote, 
253 those under the jurisdiction of the school committee. 
254  12) May at any time inquire into the conduct of the office or performance of duty of any 
255 town officer, town employee or town agency under the town manager’s general supervision. 
256  13) Shall assure that a full and complete inventory of all town-owned property, both real 
257 and personal, is kept including all property under the jurisdiction of the school committee and 
258 other elected town officers or multiple member bodies. However, immaterial or de minimis items 
259 shall not be subject to this inventory requirement. 
260  14) Shall be responsible for the negotiation of all contracts and collective bargaining 
261 agreements with town employees over wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of 
262 employment, except those under the jurisdiction of the school committee. 

14 of 27 263  15) Shall be responsible for the purchase of all supplies, materials and equipment, and 
264 shall award all contracts for supplies, materials and equipment for all departments and activities 
265 of the town, except for the school department. The town manager shall examine and inspect, or 
266 cause to be examined and inspected, the quality and the condition of all supplies, materials and 
267 equipment delivered to or received by any town 
268  department, except the school department and shall, in addition, be responsible for the 
269 disposal of all surplus supplies, materials and equipment for all departments and activities of the 
270 town, except for the school department. 
271  16) May in the manner provided in Article 6 reorganize, consolidate or abolish town 
272 agencies serving under the town manager’s general supervision in whole or in part, provide for 
273 new town agencies and when incident to any such organization, with the approval of the finance 
274 committee, transfer all or a portion of the appropriation made for one town agency to another. 
275  17) Shall be in charge of all machines and software other than machines and software 
276 used for educational or classroom purposes, and shall allocate the use thereof among the several 
277 town agencies. 
278  18) May authorize any subordinate officer or employee to exercise any power or duty 
279 which the town manager is authorized to perform, provided however, that all acts which are 
280 performed under any such delegation shall be deemed to be the town manager’s acts. 
281  19) Shall perform such other duties as may be required by the charter, by by-law, by town 
282 meeting vote, by vote of the Select Board, or otherwise. 
283  Section 4-3 Acting Town Manager 

15 of 27 284  (a) Temporary Absence - The town manager shall, by letter filed with the Select Board 
285 and a copy filed with the town clerk, designate a qualified town officer or employee to exercise 
286 the powers and perform the duties of the office of town manager during such temporary 
287  absence. During the temporary absence of the town manager, the Select Board may not 
288 revoke such designation until at least ten working days have elapsed, whereupon it may 
289 designate another qualified town officer or employee to serve as acting town manager until the 
290 town manager shall return and assume town manager’s duties. 
291  (b) Vacancy - Any vacancy in the office of town manager shall be filled as soon as 
292 possible by the Select Board but pending such appointment the Select Board shall designate a 
293 qualified town officer or employee or other qualified individual to perform the duties of the town 
294 manager on an acting basis. The appointment of an acting town manager shall be for a term not 
295 to exceed three months, provided, however, renewals not to exceed three months each and not to 
296 exceed a total of an additional nine months may be provided. 
297  (c) Powers and Duties - The powers of a temporary or acting town manager, under (a) or 
298 (b) above, shall be limited to matters not admitting of delay and shall include authority to make 
299 appointments or designations to town office or employment, except that, for positions reporting 
300 directly to the town manager, only an acting appointment or designation may be made unless a 
301 permanent appointment is authorized in advance by the Select Board and the appointee is 
302 subsequently approved by the Select Board. 
303  Charter Section 4-4. The pre-existing Section 4-4, including subsections 4-4(a), (b), (c), 
304 (d) and (e), of the Town of Natick Home Rule Charter is hereby deleted and replaced, 
305 respectively in numerical order, with the following replacement language set forth below and a 

16 of 27 306 new Charter Section 4(f) is hereby inserted to follow replaced Charter Section 4(e), the text of 
307 which new Charter Section 4 (f) is set forth below. 
308  Section 4-4 Removal and Suspension 
309  The Select Board, by a vote of the majority of the Select Board then elected and serving, 
310 taken with the prior notice to all Select Board members such that all Select Board members have 
311 a reasonable opportunity to be present, may terminate the town manager from such office in 
312 accordance with the following procedure: 
313  (a) During probationary period: notice in writing of termination. 
314  (b) After probationary period: The town manager shall not be dismissed except for 
315 inefficiency, incapacity, conduct unbecoming the office, insubordination or other good cause, 
316 nor unless at least thirty days prior to the meeting at which the vote is to be taken, the town 
317 manager shall have been notified of such intended vote; nor unless, if town manager so requests 
318 in writing, the town manager shall have been furnished by the Select Board with a written 
319 statement of the charge or charges or the cause or causes for which such dismissal is proposed; 
320 nor unless, if the town manager so requests in writing, the town manager has been given a 
321 hearing before the Select Board which may be either public or private at the option of the town 
322 manager, and at which the town manager may be represented by counsel, present evidence, and 
323 call witnesses to testify in the town manager’s behalf and examine them. 
324  (c) Anything contained in this provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the nonrenewal 
325 of the term of appointment of the town manager shall not be considered to be a dismissal and the 
326 provisions of this Section, 4-4 (a) and (b), shall not apply. 

17 of 27 327  (d) The town manager may be suspended from office by a procedure following the same 
328 steps outlined above for removal. 
329  (e) The town manager shall continue to receive full salary until thirty days following the 
330 date a final vote of removal has become effective. 
331  (f) Notwithstanding any provision of the charter to the contrary, no performance review 
332 of the town manager by a Select Board and no defect or omission by a Select Board in the 
333 performance review of the town manager, or failure of the Select Board to conduct a 
334 performance review of the town manager, shall constitute an impediment or barrier to removal or 
335 suspension under this section.” 
336  SECTION 6: Charter Article 5 Amendments 
337  Charter Section 5-2(a), Section 5-3, Section 5-4, Section 5-5, Section 5-6, and Section 5-
338 8 
339  The pre-existing Section 5-2(a), Section 5-3, Section 5-4, Section 5-5, Section 5-6 and 
340 Section 5-8 of the Town of Natick Home Rule Charter are hereby deleted, and replaced, 
341 respectively in numerical order, with the following replacement language set forth below. 
342  Section 5-2 School Department Budget 
343  (a) Submission to Town Manager - The superintendent of schools’ proposed budget shall 
344 be submitted to the town manager in sufficient time to enable the town manager to consider its 
345 effect on the total town budget which the town manager is required to submit under this article. 
346  Section 5-3 Submission of Preliminary Budget 

18 of 27 347  Within a time fixed by by-law, before the date on which the representative town meeting 
348 is to meet in its spring session, the town manager shall submit to the finance committee a 
349 preliminary budget for the ensuing year, with an accompanying budget message and supporting 
350 documents. The town manager shall, simultaneously, provide for the publication in a local 
351 newspaper a general summary of the preliminary budget. This notice shall also indicate the times 
352 and places at which complete copies of the preliminary budget and accompanying materials are 
353 available for examination by the public. 
354  Section 5-4 Budget Message 
355  The budget message submitted by the town manager shall, at a minimum: 
356  • Provide a comprehensive overview of the proposed budget; 
357  • Explain the Town’s fiscal condition including noteworthy changes in various 
358 revenue and expense categories as well as reserves; 
359  • Outline proposed financial policies of the town for the ensuing fiscal year; 
360  • Indicate any major variations from the current financial policies together with the 
361 reasons for such changes; 
362  • Identify changed priorities and the reasons for such changes; 
363  • Summarize the town’s debt position; 
364  • Provide an analysis of significant trends and fiscal challenges and the 
365 administration’s proposed responses thereto; 

19 of 27 366  • Describe and summarize significant changes, if any, in town services and/or 
367 staffing levels and the reasons for such changes; 
368  • Include such additional information as the town manager deems desirable or the 
369 Select Board may require; 
370  • The Representative Town Meeting may, by by-law, require certain information on 
371 assets and liabilities of the Town to be provided as part of the budget message. 
372  Section 5-5 The Preliminary Budget 
373  The preliminary budget, in conjunction with the town manager’s budget message, shall 
374 provide a complete financial plan of all town funds, including the superintendent of schools’ 
375 proposed budget as submitted under Section 5-2 and shall explain differences, if any, between 
376 that proposal and the town manager’s recommended appropriation for the school department. 
377 The preliminary budget must clearly identify any variances between the total recommended 
378 appropriations and projected available revenues and identify one or more scenarios for 
379 addressing such variances. Except as may otherwise be required by general law, or by the 
380 charter, the financial plan shall be in the form the town manager deems desirable, or as the Select 
381 Board may require. In the presentation of the preliminary budget, the town manager shall make 
382 use of modern concepts of fiscal presentation so as to furnish a maximum amount of information 
383 and the best financial controls. Any and all submitted budgets shall be arranged to show the 
384 actual and estimated revenues and expenditures for the previous, current, and ensuing fiscal 
385 years and shall indicate, in separate sections: 

20 of 27 386  (a) Proposed expenditures for current operations during the ensuing fiscal year, detailed 
387 by town agency, function and work programs, and the proposed methods of financing such 
388 expenditures. 
389  (b) Proposed capital expenditures during the ensuing fiscal year, detailed by town agency, 
390 and the proposed methods of financing such expenditures. 
391  (c) Estimated surplus revenue and free cash at the end of the current fiscal year, including 
392 estimated balances in any special accounts established for specific purposes. 
393  Section 5-6 Action on the Town Manager’s Preliminary Budget 
394  (a) Public Hearing - The finance committee shall forthwith, upon receipt of the 
395 preliminary budget, provide for the publication in a local newspaper of a notice stating the initial 
396 date, time and place, not less than seven nor more than fourteen days following such publication, 
397 when the first of one or more public hearings will be held by the finance committee on the 
398 preliminary budget. 
399  (b) Review - The finance committee shall consider, in open public meetings, the detailed 
400 expenditures proposed by each town agency and may confer with representatives of any town 
401 agency in connection with its review and consideration. The finance committee may require the 
402 town manager, or any other town agency, to furnish it with such additional information as it may 
403 deem necessary to assist it in its review of any submitted budget. 
404  (c) Presentation to the Representative Town Meeting - The finance committee shall file a 
405 report containing its recommendations for actions on the proposed budget which shall be 
406 available at least seven days prior to the date on which the town meeting acts on the proposed 

21 of 27 407 budget. When the proposed budget is before the town meeting for action it shall first be subject 
408 to amendment, if any, by the finance committee. 
409  Section 5-8 Capital Improvement Program 
410  The town manager shall submit a capital improvement program to the Select Board and 
411 to the finance committee at least thirty days prior to the date fixed by by-law for the submission 
412 of the proposed operating budget. The capital improvement program shall include, but need not 
413 be limited to the following: 
414  (a) A clear, concise, general summary of its contents. 
415  (b) A listing of all capital expenditures proposed to be made, by years, during the five 
416 fiscal years next ensuing, with supporting information as to the need for each such expenditure. 
417  (c) Cost estimates, methods of financing and recommended time schedules. 
418  (d) The estimated annual cost of operating and of maintaining any new facility or piece of 
419 major equipment involved. 
420  The information is to be annually revised with regard to all items still pending, or in the 
421 process of being acquired, improved or constructed. 
422  SECTION 7: Charter Article 6 amendments 
423  Charter Section 6-1. The pre-existing Section 6-1, including subsections 6-1(a) and 6-
424 1(b), is hereby deleted and replaced, respectively in numerical order, with the following 
425 replacement language set forth below. 
426  Section 6-1 Organization of Town Agencies 

22 of 27 427  The organization of the town into operating agencies for the provision of services and the 
428 administration of the government may be accomplished through one of the methods provided in 
429 this section. 
430  (a) By-Laws - Subject only to an express prohibition in a general law or this charter, the 
431 representative town meeting may, by by-law, reorganize, consolidate or abolish, create, merge or 
432 divide, alter the term of office, the manner of selection, or, if a multiple member body, the 
433 number of members of any town agency, in whole or in part, establish new town agencies and 
434 may prescribe the functions, powers, duties and responsibilities of any such town agency. 
435  The charter and by-laws shall take precedence over any other organization, 
436 reorganization, or modification under this Section 6-1. 
437  (b) Administrative Code - The town manager, after consultation with the Select Board, 
438 may from time to time, prepare and submit to the representative town meeting plans of 
439 organization, or reorganization of town agencies, as provided in Section 4-2 (16). 
440  Whenever the town manager prepares such a plan, the town manager shall, in conjunction 
441 with the Select Board, hold one or more public hearings on such proposal, giving notice by 
442 publication in a local newspaper of the date, time and place of the public hearing and the scope 
443 of the proposal. 
444  The town manager shall, following such hearing provide for the submission of the 
445 proposed organizational plan, which may be amended or revised as a result of information 
446 developed at the public hearing, to be submitted to the next session of the representative town 
447 meeting. The authority of the representative town meeting concerning the proposed 
448 organizational plan shall be limited to the approval or the rejection of it; the representative town 

23 of 27 449 meeting shall not vote to amend or to alter the proposed plan. No proposed plan under this 
450 subsection shall contradict the provisions of any by-law. 
451  Charter Article 6 Sections 6-3 and 6-4 and 6-5 . The pre-existing Section 6-3 and the pre-
452 existing Section 6-4 and Section 6-5 are hereby deleted. Further, new Charter Section 6-3 and 
453 new Charter Section 6- 4 are hereby inserted in the Natick Home Rule Charter, respectively in 
454 numerical order, with the following new language as set forth below. 
455  Section 6-3 Additional Appointments by the Select Board 
456  (a) Appointments - In addition to appointments provided in statute, elsewhere in the 
457 charter or in by-law, the Select Board shall appoint a town comptroller as provided for in by-law 
458 for a term of up to five years, a director of veterans’ services for a term of up to five years, a 
459 police chief for a term of up to five years, a fire chief for a term of up to five years and town 
460 counsel as provided in by-law. Subject to by-law, the town comptroller appointed by the Select 
461 Board under this sub section may appoint assistants subject to the approval of the Select Board. 
462  (b) Approval of Appointments Made By The Town Manager - The appointments made 
463 by the Town Manager for treasurer-collector, assistant treasurer collector, and town clerk shall 
464 each separately be subject to the affirmative vote approval of the Select Board. Failure of the 
465 Select Board to act regarding the approval or disapproval of any such appointee of the town 
466 manager within thirty days of notice to the Select Board shall constitute an affirmative approval 
467 by the Select Board. To empower the approval by the Select Board under this subsection, the 
468 Town Manager shall forthwith notify the Select Board of any vacancy or resignation from the 
469 positions in this subsection. In the event of any failure of the town manager to appoint or to 
470 promote on a timely basis, such appointments and promotions may be made by the Select Board 

24 of 27 471 following the same requirements referenced in the following section. The provisions of this 
472 subsection shall apply to reappointments. 
473  Section 6-4 Additional Appointments by the Town Manager 
474  (a) Additional Appointments - In addition to other appointments as may be required or 
475 provided for elsewhere in the charter or by-laws, the town manager shall, notwithstanding any 
476 law to the contrary, appoint, subject to the provisions of Section 6-3, the positions in this Section 
477 6-4 as provided below. The town meeting may, by by-law and not inconsistent with law, 
478 establish minimum qualifications, education, experience duties and responsibilities for the 
479 positions named in this subsection. The town meeting may, by by-law, and the Select Board by 
480 vote may require the town manager to use assessment centers, similar  techniques, screening 
481 committees or other evaluation processes for candidates for these positions. Any person 
482 appointed under this subsection may be removed or suspended by the Town Manager accordance 
483 with Article 7 Section 7-11. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to reappointments. 
484  (b) Treasurer Collector and Assistant Treasurer Collector - There shall be a treasurer-
485 collector appointed by the Town Manager for a term of up to five years and an assistant 
486 treasurer-collector appointed by the Town Manager for a term of up to five years. 
487  (c) Town Clerk - There shall be a town clerk appointed by the Town Manager for a term 
488 of three years. 
489  Transition Provisions 

25 of 27 490  The Special Legislation to Amend the Home Rule Charter of the Town of Natick hereby 
491 provides by inserting under the heading therein “Transition Provisions,” as new section 6-5, the 
492 following language set forth below. 
493  6-5 Transition Provisions for Office of the Comptroller, Assistant Comptroller, 
494 Treasurer- Collector, Treasurer, Collector and Assistant Treasurer Collector and Town Clerk The 
495 pre-existing provisions of Section 6-3, pertaining to the qualifications, powers and duties of the 
496 Office of the Comptroller and the Assistant Comptroller, and the pre-existing provisions of 
497 Section 6-4, pertaining to the Treasurer-Collector, Treasurer, Collector, and the Assistant 
498 Treasurer-Collector and the pre-existing provisions of Section 6-5 pertaining to the Town Clerk 
499 shall remain in effect in the Town of Natick until a by-law addressing said matters in said 
500 sections shall take effect in the Town. 
501  SECTION 8: Charter Article 7 amendments 
502  Charter Section 7-5. The pre-existing Section 7-5 of the Town of Natick Home Rule 
503 Charter is hereby deleted and replaced, in numerical order, with the following replacement 
504 language as set forth below. 
505  Section 7-5 Number and Gender 
506  Words importing the singular number may extend and be applied to several persons or 
507 things; words importing the plural number may include the singular; words, if any, importing a 
508 particular gender shall include all genders. 

26 of 27 509  Charter Section 7-7. The pre-existing subsections (e) and (g) of Section 7-7, entitled 
510 “Definitions”, are hereby deleted and replaced, in numerical order, with the following 
511 replacement language as set forth below. 
512  (e) Local Newspaper – Unless otherwise required by the general laws, the words “local 
513 newspaper” shall, for the purposes of the town charter and by-laws, mean a newspaper of general 
514 circulation in the town of Natick, the town’s website, public temporary signage, social media 
515 and/or other communication means that alone or in any combination are reasonably capable of 
516 reaching and informing the citizens of the town based on a good faith determination made, from 
517 time to time, by the Select Board at a public hearing. 
518  (g) Multiple Member Body - The words “multiple member body” shall mean any town 
519 body consisting of two or more persons, whether elected, appointed, or otherwise constituted, but 
520 not to include the representative town meeting. An “eligible multiple member body” is any 
521 existing multiple member body that has been created by and given a charge of powers, duties 
522 and/or responsibilities in statute, charter, by-law or vote of town meeting. 
523  Charter Section 7-10. The pre-existing Section 7-10, entitled “Notice of Vacancies,” is 
524 hereby deleted and replaced, in numerical order, with the following replacement language as set 
525 forth below. 
526  Section 7-10 Notice of Vacancies 
527  (a) Whenever a vacancy occurs in any town agency, or in town employment, or when by 
528 reason of retirement or the expiration of a fixed term, a vacancy can be anticipated, the Select 
529 Board, or other appointing authority shall forthwith cause public notice of the vacancy or 
530 impending 

27 of 27 531  vacancy to be posted for not less than ten days. Such notice shall contain a description of 
532 the duties of the office or position and a listing of necessary or desirable qualifications for the 
533 position. No permanent appointment to fill a position shall be effective until at least fourteen 
534  days have elapsed following such posting, to permit reasonable consideration of all 
535 applicants. This section shall not apply to positions covered by the civil service law and rules or 
536 if in conflict with the requirements provided under the terms of a collective bargaining 
537 agreement. 
538  (b) When the term of any non-compensated appointed position is due to expire, the 
539 position shall be advertised, even if a vacancy is not anticipated. 
540  (c) The above requirements do not apply to the expiration of appointments for a 
541 compensated positions where a vacancy does not exist or is not anticipated.